Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-672.09
Assessments; maturity; interest; rate.

All special assessments provided for in section 16-672.08 shall become due in fifty days after the date of levy and may be paid within that time without interest, but if not so paid, they shall bear interest at the rate set by the city council until delinquent. Such assessments shall become delinquent in equal annual installments over such period of years as the mayor and city council may determine at the time of making the levy. Delinquent installments shall bear interest at the rate specified in section 45-104.01, as such rate may from time to time be adjusted by the Legislature, until paid and shall be collected in the usual manner for the collection of general taxes and shall be subject to the same penalties.

Laws 1961, c. 46, § 9, p. 181;

Laws 1969, c. 51, § 36, p. 294;

Laws 1980, LB 933, § 16;

Laws 1981, LB 167, § 17.